Washington statutes.
RCW 19.86.070

Labor not an article of commerce—Chapter not to affect mutual, nonprofit organizations.

The labor of a human being is not a commodity or article of commerce. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to forbid the existence and operation of labor, agricultural, or horticultural organizations, instituted for the purposes of mutual help, and not having capital stock or conducted for profit, or to forbid or restrain individual members of such organizations from lawfully carrying out the legitimate objects thereof.

[ 1961 c 216 s 7.]

NOTES:

Labor regulations: Title 49 RCW.